Illinois, session 104th, HB2996.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Division 22 to Article 10 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/Art. 10 Div. 22 heading new)7Division 22. Wireless telecommunications towers. 8    (35 ILCS 200/10-810 new)9    Sec. 10-810. Wireless telecommunications towers. 10Notwithstanding any other provision of law, wireless 11telecommunication towers that are not otherwise exempt under a 12specific provision of this Code are subject to local property 13taxes and shall be valued according to policies adopted by the 14chief county assessment officer. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.